Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.09] PANIC ALERT SYSTEMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Citation. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as "Alyssa's Law." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "School" means an independent or special school district, a charter school organized in chapter 124E, or a nonpublic school as defined in section 123B.41, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (c) "School facility" means a school building where student instruction takes place and includes all locations where students and staff are present during the school day. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Panic alert system. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school must implement a wearable panic alert system at each school facility. Each wearable panic alert system must be capable of integrating with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 911 calls and mobile activations and initiating a campus-wide lockdown notification. new text end new text begin (b) Each school must provide each staff person in a school facility with a wearable panic alert device that allows for immediate contact with local emergency response agencies. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Training. new text end new text begin Prior to the first day of school each year, each school must ensure that all school facility personnel receive training on the protocol for and appropriate use of the panic alert device. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Security information. new text end new text begin (a) Each school must ensure that all security information within a school facility, including camera, map, and access control information, is accessible by a local law enforcement agency to the extent authorized under chapter 13. new text end new text begin (b) Each school must coordinate with the local law enforcement agency to establish appropriate access protocols for security information. new text end new text begin (c) Each school must retain ownership of security information or other information generated by the panic alert system under this section. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Panic alert systems. new text end new text begin (a) To reimburse schools for the cost of implementing panic alert system requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.09: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must reimburse schools in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end